Wyoming, session 2026, HB0040.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 21-9-105 is created to read:

21-9-105. Suicide prevention instruction.

A school district shall provide suicide prevention
education to students. A school district shall provide
educational programs under this subsection in any
appropriate manner, which may include age-appropriate,
evidence-based programs on suicide prevention provided that
HB0040

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0320
the programs shall be consistent with the suicide
prevention education materials provided under W.S.
21-2-202(a)(xxxv) and the training provided under W.S.
21-3-110(a)(xxxiii).

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0040